New Mexico, session 2026, HB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 34-6-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1968,
Chapter 69, Section 7, as amended) is amended to read:
"34-6-4. JUDGES--FIRST JUDICIAL DISTRICT.--There shall
be eleven district judges in the first judicial district."
SECTION 2. Section 34-6-5 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1968,
Chapter 69, Section 8, as amended) is amended to read:
"34-6-5. JUDGES--SECOND JUDICIAL DISTRICT.--There shall
be thirty-one district judges in the second judicial
district." HB 95/a
Page 1